Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.050

License—Grounds for denying.

A license to operate as a farm labor contractor shall be denied:

(1) To any person who sells or proposes to sell intoxicating liquors in a building or on premises where he or she operates or proposes to operate as a farm labor contractor, or

(2) To a person whose license has been revoked within three years from the date of application.

[ 1985 c 280 s 5; 1955 c 392 s 5.]